Ohio, session 136, SB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3501.01, 3503.09, 3503.10, 3503.11, 3503.14, 3503.15, 3503.153, 3503.16, 3503.19, 3503.20, 3503.23, 3503.28, 3505.181, 3509.02, 3509.03, 3509.04, 3509.08, 3513.041, 3513.05, 3513.07, 3513.18, 3513.19, 3513.191, 3513.257, 3517.012, 3517.013, and 3599.12 be amended and section 3503.071 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3501.01. As used in the sections of the Revised Code relating to elections and political communications: (A) "General election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in each November. (B) "Regular municipal election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year. (C) "Regular state election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each even-numbered year. (D) "Special election" means any election other than those elections defined in other divisions of this section. A special election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May or November, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August in accordance with section 3501.022 of the Revised Code, or on the day authorized by a particular municipal or county charter for the holding of a primary election, except that in any year in which a presidential primary election is held, no special election shall be held in May, except as authorized by a municipal or county charter, but may be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March. (E)(1) "Primary" or "primary election" means an election held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of political parties and as delegates and alternates to the conventions of political parties. Primary elections shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each year except in years in which a presidential primary election is held. (2) "Presidential primary election" means a primary election as defined by division (E)(1) of this section at which an election is held for the purpose of choosing delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the major political parties pursuant to section 3513.12 of the Revised Code. Unless otherwise specified, presidential primary elections are included in references to primary elections. In years in which a presidential primary election is held, all primary elections shall be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March except as otherwise authorized by a municipal or county charter. (F) "Political party" means any group of voters meeting the requirements set forth in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code for the formation and existence of a political party. (1) "Major political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state whose candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received not less than twenty per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. (2) "Minor political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state that meets either of the following requirements: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the political party's candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received less than twenty per cent but not less than three per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. A political party that meets the requirements of this division remains a political party for a period of four years after meeting those requirements. (b) The political party has filed with the secretary of state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a petition that meets the requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. A newly formed political party shall be known as a minor political party until the time of the first election for governor or president which occurs not less than twelve months subsequent to the formation of such party, after which election the status of such party shall be determined by the vote for the office of governor or president. (G) "Dominant party in a precinct" or "dominant political party in a precinct" means that political party whose candidate for election to the office of governor at the most recent regular state election at which a governor was elected received more votes than any other person received for election to that office in such precinct at such election. (H) "Candidate" means any qualified person certified in accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code for placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state, or any qualified person who claims to be a write-in candidate, or who knowingly assents to being represented as a write-in candidate by another at either a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state. (I) "Independent candidate" means any candidate who claims is not to be affiliated with a political party, and whose name has been certified on the office-type ballot at a general or special election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and nominating petition, as prescribed in section 3513.257 of the Revised Code. (J) "Nonpartisan candidate" means any candidate whose name is required, pursuant to section 3505.04 of the Revised Code, to be listed on the nonpartisan ballot, including all candidates for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of any board of education, for municipal or township offices in which primary elections are not held for nominating candidates by political parties, and for offices of municipal corporations having charters that provide for separate ballots for elections for these offices. (K) "Party candidate" means any candidate who claims to be a member of is affiliated with a political party and who has been certified to appear on the office-type ballot at a general or special election as the nominee of a political party because the candidate has won the primary election of the candidate's party for the public office the candidate seeks, has been nominated under section 3517.012, or is selected by party committee in accordance with section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (L) "Officer of a political party" includes, but is not limited to, any member, elected or appointed, of a controlling committee, whether representing the territory of the state, a district therein, a county, township, a city, a ward, a precinct, or other territory, of a major or minor political party. (M) "Question or issue" means any question or issue certified in accordance with the Revised Code for placement on an official ballot at a general or special election to be held in this state. (N) "Elector" or "qualified elector" means a person having the qualifications provided by law to be entitled to vote. (O) "Voter" means an elector who votes at an election. (P) "Voting residence" means that place of residence of an elector which shall determine the precinct in which the elector may vote. (Q) "Precinct" means a district within a county established by the board of elections of such county within which all qualified electors having a voting residence therein may vote at the same polling place. (R) "Polling place" means that place provided for each precinct at which the electors having a voting residence in such precinct may vote. (S) "Board" or "board of elections" means the board of elections appointed in a county pursuant to section 3501.06 of the Revised Code. (T) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, city, village, or school district. (U) "Election officer" or "election official" means any of the following: (1) Secretary of state; (2) Employees of the secretary of state serving the division of elections in the capacity of attorney, administrative officer, administrative assistant, elections administrator, office manager, or clerical supervisor; (3) Director of a board of elections; (4) Deputy director of a board of elections; (5) Member of a board of elections; (6) Employees of a board of elections; (7) Precinct election officials; (8) Employees appointed by the boards of elections on a temporary or part-time basis. (V) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, informing a voter registration applicant or an applicant who wishes to change the applicant's residence or name of the status of the application; the information necessary to complete or update the application, if any; and if the application is complete, the precinct in which the applicant is to vote. (W) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, to a registered elector to confirm the registered elector's current address. (X) "Designated agency" means an office or agency in the state that provides public assistance or that provides state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities and that is required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 to implement a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, or any other public or government office or agency that implements a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, including the department of job and family services, the program administered under section 3701.132 of the Revised Code by the department of health, the department of mental health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, and any other agency the secretary of state designates. "Designated agency" does not include public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, or the office of a county treasurer. (Y) "National Voter Registration Act of 1993" means the "National Voter Registration Act of 1993," 107 Stat. 77, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973gg. (Z) "Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the "Voting Rights Act of 1965," 79 Stat. 437, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973, as amended. (AA)(1) "Photo identification" means one of the following documents that includes the individual's name and photograph and is not expired: (a) An Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued by the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code; (b) A United States passport or passport card; (c) A United States military identification card, Ohio national guard identification card, or United States department of veterans affairs identification card. (2) A "copy" of an individual's photo identification means images of both the front and back of a document described in division (AA)(1) of this section, except that if the document is a United States passport, a copy of the photo identification means an image of the passport's identification page that includes the individual's name, photograph, and other identifying information and the passport's expiration date. (BB) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code that authorizes an individual to drive. "Driver's license" includes a driver's license, commercial driver's license, probationary license, restricted license, motorcycle operator's license, or temporary instruction permit identification card. "Driver's license" does not include a limited term license issued under section 4506.14 or 4507.09 of the Revised Code. (CC) "State identification card" means a card issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. (DD) "Interim identification form" means the document issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar to an applicant for a driver's license or state identification card that contains all of the information otherwise found on the license or card and that an applicant may use as a form of identification until the physical license or card arrives in the mail. Sec. 3503.071. (A)(1) An elector's political party affiliation shall be determined based on the most recent of the following: (a) The elector's affiliation with a currently recognized political party or the elector's unaffiliated status, as indicated on the elector's most recent voter registration application or voter registration update form as processed under divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section; (b) The ballot the elector most recently cast at a primary election in this state held on or after May 3, 2022. If the elector cast the ballot of a currently recognized political party, the elector is affiliated with that party. If the elector cast an issues-only ballot, the elector is unaffiliated. (2) If an elector has not indicated an affiliation with a currently recognized political party on a voter registration application or voter registration update form and has not cast the ballot of a currently recognized political party at a primary election in this state held on or after May 3, 2022, the elector is unaffiliated. (B)(1) Each voter registration application and voter registration update form prescribed by the secretary of state shall include all of the following: (a) A list of the political parties that are recognized in this state, accompanied by boxes for the applicant to check to select a party with which the applicant wishes to be affiliated; (b) A space for the applicant to write the name of a recognized political party that is not listed on the form, if the applicant wishes to be affiliated with that party; (c) A box for the applicant to check to indicate that the applicant does not wish to be affiliated with any political party; (d) A notice that the applicant may select or write the name of only one recognized political party and that the applicant is not required to select a political party. (2) An applicant who submits a voter registration application or update form shall be considered unaffiliated if either of the following apply: (a) The applicant indicates on the application or form that the applicant does not wish to be affiliated with any political party. (b) The applicant is not currently affiliated with a political party, does not select or write the name of a recognized political party, and does not indicate that the applicant does not wish to be affiliated with any political party. (3) An applicant who submits a voter registration update form shall remain affiliated with the applicant's current political party if the applicant currently is affiliated with a political party, does not select or write the name of a recognized political party, and does not indicate that the applicant does not wish to be affiliated with any political party. Sec. 3503.09. (A)(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules for the electronic transmission by boards of elections, designated agencies, public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, and offices of county treasurers, where applicable, of name and residence changes for voter registration records in the statewide voter registration databaseupdate forms. (2) The secretary of state shall adopt rules for the purpose of improving the speed of processing new voter registrations that permit information from a voter registration application received by a designated agency to be made available electronically, in addition to requiring the original voter registration application to be transmitted to the applicable board of elections under division (E)(2) of section 3503.10 of the Revised Code. (B) Rules adopted under division (A) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Prohibit any direct electronic connection between a designated agency, public high school or vocational school, public library, or office of a county treasurer and the statewide voter registration database; (2) Require any updated voter registration information to be verified by the secretary of state or a board of elections before the information is added to the statewide voter registration database for the purpose of modifying an existing voter registration; (3) Require each designated agency that transmits voter registration information electronically to transmit an identifier for data relating to each new voter registration that shall be used by the secretary of state or a board of elections to match the electronic data to the original voter registration application. Sec. 3503.10. (A) Each designated agency shall designate one person within that agency to serve as coordinator for the voter registration program within the agency and its departments, divisions, and programs. The designated person shall be trained under a program designed by the secretary of state and shall be responsible for administering all aspects of the voter registration program for that agency as prescribed by the secretary of state. The designated person shall receive no additional compensation for performing such duties. (B) Every designated agency, public high school and vocational school, public library, and office of a county treasurer shall provide in each of its offices or locations voter registration applications and assistance in the registration of persons qualified to register to vote, in accordance with this chapter. (C) Every designated agency shall distribute to its applicants, prior to or in conjunction with distributing a voter registration application, a form prescribed by the secretary of state that includes all of the following: (1) The question, "Do you want to register to vote or update your current voter registration?"--followed by boxes for the applicant to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or decline to register to vote, and the statement, highlighted in bold print, "If you do not check either box, you will be considered to have decided not to register to vote at this time."; (2) If the agency provides public assistance, the statement, "Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency."; (3) The statement, "If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private."; (4) The statement, "If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote, your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, or your right to choose your own political party or other political preference, you may file a complaint with the prosecuting attorney of your county or with the secretary of state," with the address and telephone number for each such official's office. (D) Each designated agency shall distribute a voter registration form prescribed by the secretary of state to each applicant with each application for service or assistance, and with each written application or form for recertification, renewal, or change of address. (E) Each designated agency shall do all of the following: (1) Have employees trained to administer the voter registration program in order to provide to each applicant who wishes to register to vote and who accepts assistance, the same degree of assistance with regard to completion of the voter registration application as is provided by the agency with regard to the completion of its own form; (2) Accept completed voter registration applications, and voter registration change of residence forms, and voter registration change of name update forms, regardless of whether the application or form was distributed by the designated agency, for transmittal to the office of the board of elections in the county in which the agency is located. Each designated agency and the appropriate board of elections shall establish a method by which the voter registration applications and other voter registration forms are transmitted to that board of elections within five days after being accepted by the agency. (3) If the designated agency is one that is primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities under a state-funded program, and that agency provides services to a person with disabilities at a person's home, provide the services described in divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section at the person's home; (4) Keep as confidential, except as required by the secretary of state for record-keeping purposes, the identity of an agency through which a person registered to vote or updated the person's voter registration records, and information relating to a declination to register to vote made in connection with a voter registration application issued by a designated agency. (F) The secretary of state shall prepare and transmit written instructions on the implementation of the voter registration program within each designated agency, public high school and vocational school, public library, and office of a county treasurer. The instructions shall include directions as follows: (1) That each person designated to assist with voter registration maintain strict neutrality with respect to a person's political philosophies, a person's right to register or decline to register, and any other matter that may influence a person's decision to register or not register to vote; (2) That each person designated to assist with voter registration not seek to influence a person's decision to register or not register to vote, not display or demonstrate any political preference or party allegiance, and not make any statement to a person or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead a person to believe that a decision to register or not register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits offered, on the grade in a particular class in school, or on credit for a particular class in school; (3) Regarding when and how to assist a person in completing the voter registration application, what to do with the completed voter registration application or voter registration update form, and when the application must be transmitted to the appropriate board of elections; (4) Regarding what records must be kept by the agency and where and when those records should be transmitted to satisfy reporting requirements imposed on the secretary of state under the National Voter Registration Act of 1993; (5) Regarding whom to contact to obtain answers to questions about voter registration forms and procedures. (G) If the voter registration activity is part of an in-class voter registration program in a public high school or vocational school, whether prescribed by the secretary of state or independent of the secretary of state, the board of education shall do all of the following: (1) Establish a schedule of school days and hours during these days when the person designated to assist with voter registration shall provide voter registration assistance; (2) Designate a person to assist with voter registration from the public high school's or vocational school's staff; (3) Make voter registration applications and materials available, as outlined in the voter registration program established by the secretary of state pursuant to section 3501.05 of the Revised Code; (4) Distribute the statement, "applying to register or declining to register to vote, or registering as affiliated with a particular political party or registering to vote and remaining unaffiliated, will not affect or be a condition of your receiving a particular grade in or credit for a school course or class, participating in a curricular or extracurricular activity, receiving a benefit or privilege, or participating in a program or activity otherwise available to pupils enrolled in this school district's schools."; (5) Establish a method by which the voter registration application and other voter registration forms are transmitted to the board of elections within five days after being accepted by the public high school or vocational school. (H) Any person employed by the designated agency, public high school or vocational school, public library, or office of a county treasurer may be designated to assist with voter registration pursuant to this section. The designated agency, public high school or vocational school, public library, or office of a county treasurer shall provide the designated person, and make available such space as may be necessary, without charge to the county or state. (I) The secretary of state shall prepare and cause to be displayed in a prominent location in each designated agency a notice that identifies the person designated to assist with voter registration, the nature of that person's duties, and where and when that person is available for assisting in the registration of voters. A designated agency may furnish additional supplies and services to disseminate information to increase public awareness of the existence of a person designated to assist with voter registration in every designated agency. (J) This section does not limit any authority a board of education, superintendent, or principal has to allow, sponsor, or promote voluntary election registration programs within a high school or vocational school, including programs in which pupils serve as persons designated to assist with voter registration, provided that no pupil is required to participate. (K) Each public library and office of the county treasurer shall establish a method by which voter registration forms are transmitted to the board of elections within five days after being accepted by the public library or office of the county treasurer. (L) The department of job and family services and its departments, divisions, and programs shall limit administration of the aspects of the voter registration program for the department to the requirements prescribed by the secretary of state and the requirements of this section and the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. Sec. 3503.11. (A)(1) When any person applies for a driver's license, commercial driver's license, a state of Ohio identification card issued under section 4507.50 of the Revised Code, or motorcycle operator's license or endorsement, or the renewal or duplicate of any license or endorsement under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code, and the person presents proof of United States citizenship to the registrar of motor vehicles or the deputy registrar or has previously presented proof of United States citizenship to the registrar or any deputy registrar, the registrar or deputy registrar shall offer the applicant the opportunity to register to vote or to update the applicant's voter registration by electronic means in conjunction with the person's transaction with the registrar or deputy registrar, in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (2) When any person submits a notice of change of address to the registrar under division (C) of section 4507.09 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall offer the applicant the opportunity to submit a notice of change of address for voter registration purposes update form by electronic means in conjunction with the person's transaction with the registrar, in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (3) When a person registers to vote or updates the person's voter registration under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, the registrar or deputy registrar shall electronically transmit the person's signature that is on file with the bureau of motor vehicles with the electronic record of the voter registration or update, and that signature shall be considered the person's signature on the voter registration or update and for all other election and signature-matching purposes. (B) Within twenty-four hours after a person registers to vote or updates the person's voter registration under division (A) of this section, the registrar or deputy registrar shall transmit the electronic record of the voter registration or update to the secretary of state by electronic means in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state by rule. Rules adopted under this division shall do all of the following: (1) Prohibit any direct electronic connection between the office of the registrar or a deputy registrar and the statewide voter registration database; (2) Require any voter registration information to be verified by the secretary of state or a board of elections before the information is added to the statewide voter registration database; (3) Require the registrar or deputy registrar to electronically date stamp each electronic record in a manner that does not disclose the identity of the office that receives the voter registration or update. (C)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles and each deputy registrar also shall make available to all other customers paper voter registration applications and update forms, but are not required to offer assistance to customers in completing those forms. The bureau of motor vehicles shall supply all of its deputy registrars with a sufficient number of voter registration applications and update forms. (2) Within five days after a person submits a completed paper voter registration application or update form to the registrar or a deputy registrar, the registrar or deputy registrar shall send the form to the board of elections of the county in which the office of the registrar or deputy registrar is located. (D) The registrar shall collect from each deputy registrar through the reports filed under division (J) of section 4503.03 of the Revised Code and transmit to the secretary of state information on the number of voter registration applications and change of residence or change of name voter registration update forms completed or declined, and any additional information required by the secretary of state to comply with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. No information relating to an applicant's decision to decline to register or update the applicant's voter registration at the office of the registrar or deputy registrar may be used for any purpose other than voter registration record-keeping required by the secretary of state, and all such information shall be kept confidential. Sec. 3503.14. (A)(A)(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form and content of the voter registration, change of residence, and change of name voter registration update forms used in this state. The forms shall meet the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and shall include spaces for all of the following: (1)(a) The voter's name; (2)(b) The voter's address; (3)(c) The current date; (4)(d) The voter's date of birth; (5)(e) The voter to provide at least one of the following forms of identification: (a)(i) The voter's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number; (b)(ii) The last four digits of the voter's social security number. (6)(f) The voter's signature. (2) The form shall include the political party affiliation fields and notice described in division (B)(1) of section 3503.071 of the Revised Code. (3) The registration form shall include a space on which the person registering an applicant shall sign the person's name and provide the person's address and a space on which the person registering an applicant shall name the employer who is employing that person to register the applicant. (4) The forms shall include a box for the person filling out the form to check to indicate, if applicable, that the person has filled out all or part of the form on behalf of the applicant because the applicant declares that the applicant requires such assistance by reason of blindness, disability, or illiteracy. (5) Except for forms prescribed by the secretary of state under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, the secretary of state shall permit boards of elections to produce forms that have subdivided spaces for each individual alphanumeric character of the information provided by the voter so as to accommodate the electronic reading and conversion of the voter's information to data and the subsequent electronic transfer of that data to the statewide voter registration database established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code. (B) None of the following persons who are registering an applicant in the course of that official's or employee's normal duties shall sign the person's name, provide the person's address, or name the employer who is employing the person to register an applicant on a form prepared under this section: (1) An election official; (2) A county treasurer; (3) A deputy registrar of motor vehicles; (4) An employee of a designated agency; (5) An employee of a public high school; (6) An employee of a public vocational school; (7) An employee of a public library; (8) An employee of the office of a county treasurer; (9) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles; (10) An employee of a deputy registrar of motor vehicles; (11) An employee of an election official. (C) Except as provided in section 3501.382 of the Revised Code, any applicant who is unable to sign the applicant's own name shall make an "X," if possible, which shall be certified by the signing of the name of the applicant by the person filling out the form, who shall add the person's own signature. If an applicant is unable to make an "X," the applicant shall indicate in some manner that the applicant desires to register to vote or to change update the applicant's name or residencevoter registration. The person registering the applicant shall sign the form and attest that the applicant indicated that the applicant desired to register to vote or to change update the applicant's name or residencevoter registration. (D) No registration, change of residence, or change of name update form shall be rejected solely on the basis that a person registering an applicant failed to sign the person's name or failed to name the employer who is employing that person to register the applicant as required under division (A) of this section. (E) A voter registration application or voter registration update form submitted electronically through the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar pursuant to section 3503.11 or submitted online through the internet pursuant to section 3503.20 of the Revised Code is not required to contain a signature to be considered valid. The signature obtained under division (A)(3) of section 3503.11 or under division (B) of section 3503.20 of the Revised Code, as applicable, shall be considered the applicant's signature for all election and signature-matching purposes. (F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section and in sections 3501.382 and 3505.24 of the Revised Code, no person shall preprint or fill out any portion of a voter registration, change of residence, or change of name update form on behalf of an applicant. (2) A completed voter registration, change of residence, or change of name update form is not valid if any portion of it has been completed by any person other than the applicant in violation of division (F)(1) of this section. (G) As used in this section, "registering an applicant" includes any effort, for compensation, to provide voter registration or voter registration update forms or to assist persons in completing or returning those forms. Sec. 3503.15. (A) The secretary of state shall establish and maintain a statewide voter registration database that shall be administered by the office of data analytics and archives in the office of the secretary of state and made continuously available to each board of elections and to other agencies as authorized by law. The statewide voter registration database shall be the official list of registered electors for all elections conducted in this state. (B) The statewide voter registration database shall, at a minimum, include all of the following: (1) An electronic network that connects all board of elections offices with the office of the secretary of state and with the offices of all other boards of elections; (2) A computer program that harmonizes the records contained in the database with records maintained by each board of elections; (3) An interactive computer program that allows access to the records contained in the database by each board of elections and by any persons authorized by the secretary of state to add, delete, modify, or print database records, and to conduct updates of the database; (4) A search program capable of verifying registered electors and their registration information by name, driver's license or state identification card number, birth date, social security number, or current address; (5) Safeguards and components to ensure that the integrity, security, and confidentiality of the voter registration information is maintained; (6) Methods to retain canceled voter registration records for not less than five years after they are canceled and to record the reason for their cancellation. (C) For each registered elector, the statewide voter registration database shall include all of the following information: (1) The elector's name; (2) The elector's birth date; (3) The elector's current residence address; (4) The elector's precinct number; (5) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number, if available; (6) The last four digits of the elector's social security number, if available; (7) The elector's telephone number, if available; (8) The elector's electronic mail address, if available; (9)(a) The elector's voter registration date, which shall be determined based on the elector's most recent application to register to vote in this state, subject to division (C)(9)(b) of this section, as follows: (i) In the case of an application delivered in person to a state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, or the office of a county treasurer, the date stamped on the application upon receipt by the entity that transmits the application to the board of elections or the secretary of state; (ii) In the case of an application delivered in person to a board of elections or the secretary of state, the date stamped on the application upon receipt by the board of elections or the secretary of state, as applicable; (iii) In the case of an application delivered by mail to a board of elections or the secretary of state, the date the application is postmarked; (iv) In the case of an application submitted through the online voter registration system established under section 3503.20 of the Revised Code, the date of the online submission; (v) In the case of an application submitted to a board of elections by facsimile transmission or electronic mail under Chapter 3511. of the Revised Code, the date of the receipt of the transmission or electronic mail by the board of elections; (vi) In the case of a provisional ballot affirmation that serves as an application to register to vote in future elections because the individual who cast the ballot is not registered to vote, the date the board of elections determines that the provisional ballot is invalid under section 3505.183 of the Revised Code. (b) For purposes of determining an elector's voter registration date under division (C)(9)(a) of this section, all of the following apply: (i) An elector's voter registration date shall not be during the period beginning on the day after the close of voter registration before an election and ending on the day of the election. If the date determined under division (C)(9)(a) of this section would be during that period, the voter registration date instead shall be the date on which the board of elections processes the application to register to vote after the day of the election. (ii) A change of address or change of name voter registration update form, including a provisional ballot affirmation that serves as a change of address or change of name voter registration update form, is not considered an application to register to vote. (iii) An application to register to vote that is submitted by an individual who is already registered to vote in this state is not considered an application to register to vote. (10) The elector's political party affiliation, if any, as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code; (11) The elector's voting history, including all of the following, for each election in which the elector cast a ballot that was counted: (a) The , the date of the election; (b) If the election was a primary election, the political party whose ballot the elector cast at the primary election or an indication that the elector voted only on the questions and issues appearing on the ballot at a special election held on the day of the primary election; (c) The and the type of ballot the elector cast. (11)(12) The elector's last activity date, which shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (12)(13) Any other information the secretary of state requires to be included by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (D) Every day during the period beginning on the forty-sixth day before an election and ending on the eighty-first day after the day of the election, a board of elections shall create a daily record of its voter registration database as of four p.m. and shall transmit the daily record to the secretary of state in a secure manner prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall archive the daily record and retain it for at least twenty-two months after the day of the election. (E) The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section and sections 3503.151 to 3503.153 of the Revised Code, including rules doing all of the following: (1) Specifying the manner in which any voter registration records maintained by boards of elections in other data formats shall be converted for inclusion in the statewide voter registration database; (2) Establishing a uniform method for entering voter registration records into the statewide voter registration database on an expedited basis, but not less than once per day, if new registration information is received, and for transmitting information securely to the secretary of state; (3) Establishing a uniform method for purging canceled voter registration records from the statewide voter registration database in accordance with section 3503.21 of the Revised Code; (4) Specifying the persons authorized to add, delete, modify, or print records contained in the statewide voter registration database and to make updates of that database; (5) Establishing a process for annually auditing the information contained in the statewide voter registration database. (F) A board of elections promptly shall purge a voter's name and voter registration information from the statewide voter registration database in accordance with the rules adopted by the secretary of state under division (E)(3) of this section after the cancellation of a voter's registration under section 3503.21 of the Revised Code. (G) The secretary of state shall provide training in the operation of the statewide voter registration database to each board of elections and to any persons authorized by the secretary of state to add, delete, modify, or print database records, and to conduct updates of the database. (H) A board of elections and any vendor with which it contracts to provide voter registration software or related services shall ensure that the board's voter registration system and practices comply with the requirements of this section and any rules adopted under this section. Sec. 3503.153. (A) The statewide voter registration database shall be made available on a web site of the office of the secretary of state as follows: (1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the following information from the statewide voter registration database regarding a registered elector shall be made available on the web site: (a) The elector's name; (b) The elector's birth date; (c) The elector's current residence address; (d) The elector's precinct number; (e) The elector's voter registration date, as described in division (C)(9) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; (f) The elector's voting history, as described in division (C)(10)(C)(11) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; (g) The elector's last activity date, as described in division (C)(11)(C)(12) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code. (2) During the thirty days before the day of a primary or general election, the web site interface of the statewide voter registration database shall permit an elector to search for the polling location at which that elector may cast a ballot. (3) No information in the statewide voter registration database that is exempt from disclosure under division (A)(2) of section 3503.13 of the Revised Code shall be made available on the web site. (B)(1) The secretary of state shall establish, by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, a process for boards of elections to notify the secretary of state of changes in the locations of precinct polling places for the purpose of updating the information made available on the secretary of state's web site under division (A)(2) of this section. Those rules shall require a board of elections, during the thirty days before the day of a primary or general election, to notify the secretary of state within one business day of any change to the location of a precinct polling place within the county. (2) During the thirty days before the day of a primary or general election, not later than one business day after receiving a notification from a county pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section that the location of a precinct polling place has changed, the secretary of state shall update that information on the secretary of state's web site for the purpose of division (A)(2) of this section. Sec. 3503.16. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of section 111.44 of the Revised Code, whenever (A)(1) Whenever a registered elector changes the place of residence of that registered elector from one precinct to another within a county or from one county to another this state, or has a change of name, that registered elector shall report the change by delivering a change of residence or change of name form, whichever is appropriate, as prescribed by the secretary of state under section 3503.14 of the Revised Code to the state or local office of a designated agency, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, the office of the county treasurer, the office of the secretary of state, any office of the registrar or deputy registrar of motor vehicles, or any office of a board of elections in person or by a third person. Any voter registration, change of address, or change of name application, returned by mail, may be sent only to the secretary of state or the board of elections. A registered elector also may update the registration of that registered elector by filing a change of residence or change of name form on the day of a special, primary, or general election at the polling place in the precinct in which that registered elector resides or at the board of elections or at another site designated by the board one of the methods described in section 3503.19 of the Revised Code not later than the thirtieth day before the day of an election, except as otherwise permitted under this section. (2) Whenever a registered elector has a change of political party affiliation, the elector may report the change by one of the methods described in section 3503.19 of the Revised Code or the elector may change the elector's affiliation at a primary election by requesting and casting the ballot of the elector's new political party or by requesting and casting an issues-only ballot. (B)(1)(a) Any registered elector who moves within a precinct on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not filed a notice of reported the change of residence with the board of elections under section 3503.19 of the Revised Code may vote in that election by going to that registered elector's assigned polling place, completing and signing a notice of change of residence voter registration update form, showing photo identification, and casting a ballot. (b) Any registered elector who changes the name of that registered elector and remains within a precinct on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not filed a notice of reported the change of name with the board of elections under section 3503.19 of the Revised Code may vote in that election by going to that registered elector's assigned polling place, completing and signing a notice of a change of name voter registration update form, and casting a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. If the registered elector provides to the precinct election officials proof of a legal name change, such as a marriage license or court order that includes the elector's current and prior names, the elector may complete and sign a notice of change of name voter registration update form and cast a regular ballot. (2) Any registered elector who moves from one precinct to another within a county or moves from one precinct to another and changes the name of that registered elector on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not filed a notice of reported the change of residence or change of name, whichever is appropriate, with the board of elections under section 3503.19 of the Revised Code may vote in that election if that registered elector complies with division (G) of this section or does all of the following: (a) Appears at anytime during regular business hours on or after the twenty-eighth day prior to the election in which that registered elector wishes to vote or, if the election is held on the day of a presidential primary election, the twenty-fifth day prior to the election, through noon of the Saturday prior to the election at the office of the board of elections, appears at any time during regular business hours on the Monday prior to the election at the office of the board of elections, or appears on the day of the election at either of the following locations: (i) The polling place for the precinct in which that registered elector resides; (ii) The office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections. (b) Completes and signs, under penalty of election falsification, the written affirmation on the provisional ballot envelope, which shall serve as a notice of change of residence or change of name, whichever is appropriate voter registration update form; (c) Votes a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code at the polling place, at the office of the board of elections, or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections, whichever is appropriate, using the address to which that registered elector has moved or the name of that registered elector as changed, whichever is appropriate; (d) Completes and signs, under penalty of election falsification, a statement attesting that that registered elector moved or had a change of name, whichever is appropriate, on or prior to the day of the election, has voted a provisional ballot at the polling place for the precinct in which that registered elector resides, at the office of the board of elections, or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections, whichever is appropriate, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other location for that particular election. (C) Any registered elector who moves from one county to another county within the state on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not registered to vote in the county to which that registered elector moved reported the change of residence under section 3503.19 of the Revised Code may vote in that election if that registered elector complies with division (G) of this section or does all of the following: (1) Appears at any time during regular business hours on or after the twenty-eighth day prior to the election in which that registered elector wishes to vote or, if the election is held on the day of a presidential primary election, the twenty-fifth day prior to the election, through noon of the Saturday prior to the election at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections, appears during regular business hours on the Monday prior to the election at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections, or appears on the day of the election at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections; (2) Completes and signs, under penalty of election falsification, the written affirmation on the provisional ballot envelope, which shall serve as a notice of change of residence voter registration update form; (3) Votes a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections, using the address to which that registered elector has moved; (4) Completes and signs, under penalty of election falsification, a statement attesting that that registered elector has moved from one county to another county within the state on or prior to the day of the election, has voted at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location instead of the office of the board of elections, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other location for that particular election. (D) A person who votes by absent voter's ballots pursuant to division (G) (E) of this section shall not make written application for the ballots pursuant to Chapter 3509. of the Revised Code. Ballots cast pursuant to division (G) (E) of this section shall be set aside in a special envelope and counted during the official canvass of votes in the manner provided for in sections 3505.32 and 3509.06 of the Revised Code insofar as that manner is applicable. The board shall examine the pollbooks to verify that no ballot was cast at the polls or by absent voter's ballots under Chapter 3509. or 3511. of the Revised Code by an elector who has voted by absent voter's ballots pursuant to division (G) (E) of this section. Any ballot determined to be insufficient for any of the reasons stated above or stated in section 3509.07 of the Revised Code shall not be counted. Subject to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code, a board of elections may lease or otherwise acquire a site different from the office of the board at which registered electors may vote pursuant to division (B) or (C) of this section. (E) Upon receiving a notice of change of residence or change of name, the board of elections shall immediately send the registrant an acknowledgment notice. If the change of residence or change of name notice is valid, the board shall update the voter's registration as appropriate. If that form is incomplete, the board shall inform the registrant in the acknowledgment notice specified in this division of the information necessary to complete or update that registrant's registration. (F) Change of residence and change of name forms shall be available at each polling place, and when these forms are completed, noting changes of residence or name, as appropriate, they shall be filed with election officials at the polling place. Election officials shall return completed forms, together with the pollbooks and tally sheets, to the board of elections. The board of elections shall provide change of residence and change of name forms to the probate court and court of common pleas. The court shall provide the forms to any person eighteen years of age or older who has a change of name by order of the court or who applies for a marriage license. The court shall forward all completed forms to the board of elections within five days after receiving them. (G) A registered elector who otherwise would qualify to vote under division (B) or (C) of this section but is unable to appear at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location, on account of personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity, may vote on the day of the election if that registered elector does all of the following: (1) Makes a written application on a form prescribed by the secretary of state that includes all of the information required under section 3509.03 of the Revised Code to the appropriate board for an absent voter's ballot on or after the twenty-seventh day prior to the election in which the registered elector wishes to vote through the close of business on the seventh day prior to that election and requests that the absent voter's ballot be sent to the address to which the registered elector has moved if the registered elector has moved, or to the address of that registered elector who has not moved but has had a change of name; (2) Declares that the registered elector has moved or had a change of name, whichever is appropriate, and otherwise is qualified to vote under the circumstances described in division (B) or (C) of this section, whichever is appropriate, but that the registered elector is unable to appear at the board of elections because of personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity; (3) Completes and returns a voter registration update form along with the completed absent voter's ballot a notice of change of residence indicating the address to which the registered elector has moved, or a notice of change of name, whichever is appropriate; (4) Completes and signs, under penalty of election falsification, a statement attesting that the registered elector has moved or had a change of name on or prior to the day before the election, has voted by absent voter's ballot because of personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity that prevented the registered elector from appearing at the board of elections, and will not vote or attempt to vote at any other location or by absent voter's ballot mailed to any other location or address for that particular election. Sec. 3503.19. (A) Persons (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of section 111.44 of the Revised Code, persons qualified to register or to change update their registration because of a change of address or, change of name, or change of political party affiliation may register or change update their registration in by doing any of the following: (a) Submitting a voter registration application or a voter registration update form in person or through another person at any state or local office of a designated agency, at the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, at a public high school or vocational school, at a public library, at the office of a county treasurer, or at a branch office established by the board of elections, or ; (b) Submitting a voter registration application or a voter registration update form in person or through another person at a probate court or a court of common pleas. The board of elections shall provide the forms to the courts, and the courts shall provide the forms to any person eighteen years of age or older who has a change of name by order of the court or who applies for a marriage license. (c) Submitting a voter registration application or a voter registration update form in person, through another person, or by mail at the office of the secretary of state or at the office of a any board of elections. A registered elector may also change the elector's registration ; (d) Submitting a voter registration application or a voter registration update form through the online voter registration system under section 3503.20 of the Revised Code; (e) Submitting a voter registration application or a voter registration update form in person to the election officials on election day at any polling place where the elector is eligible to vote, in the manner provided under section 3503.16 of the Revised Code. Voter registration applications and voter registration update forms shall be available at each polling place, and the election officials shall return all completed forms, together with the pollbooks and tally sheets, to the board of elections. (f) In the case of a person who is eligible to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 52 U.S.C. 20310, returning the person's completed voter registration application or voter registration update form electronically to the office of the secretary of state or to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located pursuant to Chapter 3511. of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Any state or local office of a designated agency, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, a probate court or court of common pleas, or the office of a county treasurer shall date stamp a voter registration application or voter registration update form it receives using a date stamp that does not disclose the identity of the state or local office that receives it and shall transmit any voter registration the application or change of registration form that it receives to the board of elections of the county in which the state or local office is located, within five days after receiving the voter registration application or change of registration form. The office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles shall transmit any electronic voter registration application or change of voter registration update form that it receives to the secretary of state within twenty-four hours after receiving it, and shall transmit any paper voter registration application or change of registration form that it receives to the board of elections of the county in which the office of the registrar or deputy registrar is located within five days after receiving the voter registration application or change of registration form, as required under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code. (b) If a board of elections or the office of the secretary of state receives a voter registration application or voter registration update form before the thirtieth day before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as applicable, shall forward the application or form to the board of elections of the county in which the applicant resides within ten days after receiving it. If a board of elections or the office of the secretary of state receives a voter registration application or voter registration update form on or after the thirtieth day before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as applicable, shall forward the application or form to the board of elections of the county in which the applicant resides within thirty days after that election. (3) Except as otherwise provided in section 3503.16 of the Revised Code: (a) An otherwise valid voter registration application that is returned to the appropriate office other than by mail must be received by a state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, a probate court or court of common pleas, the office of a county treasurer, the office of the secretary of state, or the office of a board of elections no later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, special, or general election for the person to qualify as an elector eligible to vote at that election. An otherwise valid registration application received after that day entitles the elector to vote at all subsequent elections. Any state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, or the office of a county treasurer shall date stamp a registration application or change of name or change of address form it receives using a date stamp that does not disclose the identity of the state or local office that receives the registration. (b) Voter registration applications, if otherwise valid, that are returned by mail to the office of the secretary of state or to the office of a board of elections must be postmarked no later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, special, or general election in order for the person to qualify as an elector eligible to vote at that election. If an otherwise valid voter registration application that is returned by mail does not bear a postmark or a legible postmark, the registration shall be valid for that election if received by the office of the secretary of state or the office of a board of elections no later than twenty-five days preceding any special, primary, or general election. (B)(1)(B) Any person may apply in person, by telephone, by mail, or through another person for voter registration forms to the office of the secretary of state or the office of a board of elections. An individual who is eligible to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 also may apply for voter registration forms by electronic means to the office of the secretary of state or to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) An applicant may return the applicant's completed registration form in person or by mail to any state or local office of a designated agency, to a public high school or vocational school, to a public library, to the office of a county treasurer, to the office of the secretary of state, or to the office of a board of elections. An applicant who is eligible to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 also may return the applicant's completed voter registration form electronically to the office of the secretary of state or to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the Revised Code. (b) Subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section, an applicant may return the applicant's completed registration form through another person to any board of elections or the office of the secretary of state. (c) A person who receives compensation for registering a voter shall return any registration form entrusted to that person by an applicant to any board of elections or to the office of the secretary of state. (d) If a board of elections or the office of the secretary of state receives a registration form under division (B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section before the thirtieth day before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as applicable, shall forward the registration to the board of elections of the county in which the applicant is seeking to register to vote within ten days after receiving the application. If a board of elections or the office of the secretary of state receives a registration form under division (B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section on or after the thirtieth day before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as applicable, shall forward the registration to the board of elections of the county in which the applicant is seeking to register to vote within thirty days after that election. (C)(1) A board of elections that receives a voter registration application or voter registration update form and is satisfied as to the truth of the statements made in the registration application or form shall register the applicant or update the elector's registration not later than twenty business days after receiving the application, unless that application is received during the thirty days immediately preceding the day of an election. The board shall promptly notify the applicant person in writing of each of the following: (a) The applicant's fact that the person is registered to vote or has had the person's registration updated; (b) The person's political party affiliation, if any, as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code; (c) The precinct in which the applicant person is to vote; (c)(d) In bold type as follows: "Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo identification will still be able to vote by casting a provisional ballot." The notification shall be by nonforwardable mail. If the mail is returned to the board, it shall investigate and cause the notification to be delivered to the correct address. (2) If, after investigating as required under division (C)(1) of this section, the board is unable to verify the voter's correct address, it shall cause the voter's name in the official registration list and in the poll list or signature pollbook to be marked to indicate that the voter's notification was returned to the board. At the first election at which a voter whose name has been so marked appears to vote, the voter shall be required to vote by provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. If the provisional ballot is counted pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the board shall correct that voter's registration, if needed, and shall remove the indication that the voter's notification was returned from that voter's name on the official registration list and on the poll list or signature pollbook. If the provisional ballot is not counted pursuant to division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the voter's registration shall be canceled. The board shall notify the voter by United States mail of the cancellation. (3) If a notice of the disposition of an otherwise valid registration application is sent by nonforwardable mail and is returned undelivered, the person shall be registered as provided in division (C)(2) of this section and sent a confirmation notice by forwardable mail. If the person fails to respond to the confirmation notice, update the person's registration, or vote by provisional ballot as provided in division (C)(2) of this section in any election during the period of two federal elections subsequent to the mailing of the confirmation notice, the person's registration shall be canceled. Sec. 3503.20. (A) The secretary of state shall establish a secure online voter registration system. The system shall provide for all of the following: (1) An applicant to submit a voter registration application to the secretary of state online through the internet; (2) The online applicant to be registered to vote, if all of the following apply: (a) The application contains all of the following information: (i) The applicant's name; (ii) The applicant's address; (iii) The applicant's date of birth; (iv) The last four digits of the applicant's social security number; (v) The applicant's Ohio driver's license number or the number of the applicant's state identification card issued under section 4507.50 of the Revised Code. (b) The applicant's name, address, and date of birth, the last four digits of the applicant's social security number, and the applicant's Ohio driver's license number or the number of the applicant's state identification card as they are provided in the application are not inconsistent with the information on file with the bureau of motor vehicles; (c) The applicant is a United States citizen, will have lived in this state for thirty days immediately preceding the next election, will be at least eighteen years of age on or before the day of the next general election, and is otherwise eligible to register to vote; (d) The applicant attests to the truth and accuracy of the information submitted in the online application under penalty of election falsification. (3) The application to include the political party affiliation fields and notice described in division (B)(1) of section 3503.071 of the Revised Code. (B) If an individual registers to vote or a registered elector updates the elector's name, address, or both registration under this section, the secretary of state shall obtain an electronic copy of the applicant's or elector's signature that is on file with the bureau of motor vehicles. That electronic signature shall be used as the applicant's or elector's signature on voter registration records, for all election and signature-matching purposes. (C) The secretary of state shall employ whatever security measures the secretary of state considers necessary to ensure the integrity and accuracy of voter registration information submitted electronically pursuant to this section. Errors in processing voter registration applications in the online system shall not prevent an applicant from becoming registered or from voting. (D) The online voter registration application established under division (A) of this section shall include the following language: "By clicking the box below, I affirm all of the following under penalty of election falsification, which is a felony of the fifth degree: (1) I am the person whose name and identifying information is provided on this form, and I desire to register to vote, or update my voter registration, in the State of Ohio. (2) All of the information I have provided on this form is true and correct as of the date I am submitting this form. (3) I am a United States citizen. (4) I will have lived in Ohio for thirty days immediately preceding the next election. (5) I will be at least eighteen years of age on or before the day of the next general election. (6) I authorize the Bureau of Motor Vehicles to transmit to the Ohio Secretary of State my signature that is on file with the Bureau of Motor Vehicles, and I understand and agree that the signature transmitted by the Bureau of Motor Vehicles will be used by the Secretary of State to validate this electronic voter registration application as if I had signed this form personally." In order to register to vote or update a voter registration under division (A) of this section, an applicant or elector shall be required to mark the box in the online voter registration application that appears in conjunction with the previous statement. (E) The online voter registration process established under division (A) of this section shall be in operation and available for use by individuals who wish to register to vote or update their voter registration information online not earlier than January 1, 2017. During the period beginning on the first day after the close of voter registration before an election and ending on the day of the election, the online voter registration system shall display a notice indicating that the applicant will not be registered to vote for the purposes of that election. (F) Notwithstanding section 1.50 of the Revised Code, if any provision of this section or of division (E) of section 3503.14 of the Revised Code is held invalid, or if the application of any provision of this section or of that division to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then this section and that division cease to operate. Sec. 3503.23. (A) Fourteen days before an election, the board of elections shall cause to be prepared from the statewide voter registration database established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code a complete and official registration list for each precinct, containing the names, addresses, and political party whose ballot the elector voted in the most recent primary election within the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years, affiliations of all qualified registered voters in the precinct, except as otherwise provided in section 111.44 of the Revised Code. All the names, insofar as practicable, shall be arranged in alphabetical order. The lists may be prepared either in sheet form on one side of the paper or in electronic form, at the discretion of the board. Each precinct list shall be headed "Register of Voters," and under the heading shall be indicated the district or ward and precinct. Appended to each precinct list shall be attached the names of the members of the board and the name of the director. A sufficient number of such lists shall be provided for distribution to the candidates, political parties, or organized groups that apply for them. The board shall have each precinct list available at the board for viewing by the public during normal business hours. The board shall ensure that, by the opening of the polls on the day of a general or primary election, each precinct has a paper copy of the registration list of voters in that precinct. (B) On the day of a general or primary election, precinct election officials shall do both of the following: (1) By the time the polls open, conspicuously post and display at the polling place one copy of the registration list of voters in that precinct in an area of the polling place that is easily accessible; (2) At 11 a.m. and 4 p.m. place a mark, on the official registration list posted at the polling place, before the name of those registered voters who have voted. (C) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 3501.35 of the Revised Code, any person may enter the polling place for the sole purpose of reviewing the official registration list posted in accordance with division (B) of this section, provided that the person does not engage in conduct that would constitute harassment in violation of the election law, as defined in section 3501.90 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3503.28. (A) The secretary of state shall develop an information brochure regarding voter registration. The brochure shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (1) The applicable deadlines for registering to vote or for returning an applicant's completed registration form; (2) The applicable deadline for returning an applicant's completed registration form if the person returning the form is being compensated for registering voters; (3) The manner in which a person may establish or change the person's political party affiliation; (4) The locations to which a person may return an applicant's completed registration form; (4) (5) The location to which a person who is compensated for registering voters may return an applicant's completed registration form; (5) (6) The registration and affirmation requirements applicable to persons who are compensated for registering voters under section 3503.29 of the Revised Code; (6) (7) A notice, which shall be written in bold type, stating as follows: "Voters must bring photo identification to the polls in order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo identification will still be able to vote by casting a provisional ballot." (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, a board of elections, designated agency, public high school, public vocational school, public library, office of a county treasurer, or deputy registrar of motor vehicles shall distribute a copy of the brochure developed under division (A) of this section to any person who requests more than two voter registration forms at one time. (C)(1) The secretary of state shall provide the information required to be included in the brochure developed under division (A) of this section to any person who prints a voter registration form that is made available on a web site of the office of the secretary of state. (2) If a board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board shall provide the information required to be included in the brochure developed under division (A) of this section to any person who prints a voter registration form that is made available on that web site. (D) A board of elections shall not be required to distribute a copy of a brochure under division (B) of this section to any of the following officials or employees who are requesting more than two voter registration forms at one time in the course of the official's or employee's normal duties: (1) An election official; (2) A county treasurer; (3) A deputy registrar of motor vehicles; (4) An employee of a designated agency; (5) An employee of a public high school; (6) An employee of a public vocational school; (7) An employee of a public library; (8) An employee of the office of a county treasurer; (9) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles; (10) An employee of a deputy registrar of motor vehicles; (11) An employee of an election official. (E) As used in this section, "registering voters" includes any effort, for compensation, to provide voter registration forms or to assist persons in completing or returning those forms. Sec. 3505.181. (A) All of the following individuals shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot at an election: (1) An individual who declares that the individual is a registered voter in the precinct in which the individual desires to vote and that the individual is eligible to vote in an election, but the name of the individual does not appear on the official list of eligible voters for the precinct or an election official asserts that the individual is not eligible to vote; (2) An individual who does not have or is unable to provide photo identification to the election officials; (3) An individual whose name in the poll list or signature pollbook has been marked under section 3509.09 or 3511.13 of the Revised Code as having requested an absent voter's ballot or a uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot for that election and who appears to vote at the polling place; (4) An individual whose notification of registration has been returned undelivered to the board of elections and whose name in the official registration list and in the poll list or signature pollbook has been marked under division (C)(2) of section 3503.19 of the Revised Code; (5) An individual who has been successfully challenged under section 3505.20 or 3513.20 3513.19 of the Revised Code; (6) An individual who changes the individual's name and remains within the precinct without providing proof of that name change under division (B)(1)(b) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code, moves from one precinct to another within a county, moves from one precinct to another and changes the individual's name, or moves from one county to another within the state, and completes and signs the required forms and statements under division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code; (7) An individual whose signature, in the opinion of the precinct officers under section 3505.22 of the Revised Code, is not that of the person who signed that name in the registration forms. (B) An individual who is eligible to cast a provisional ballot under division (A) of this section shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot as follows: (1) An election official at the polling place shall notify the individual that the individual may cast a provisional ballot in that election. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (F) of this section, the individual shall complete and execute a written affirmation before an election official at the polling place stating that the individual is both of the following: (a) A registered voter in the precinct in which the individual desires to vote; (b) Eligible to vote in that election. (3) An election official at the polling place shall transmit the ballot cast by the individual and the voter information contained in the written affirmation executed by the individual under division (B)(2) of this section to an appropriate local election official for verification under division (B)(4) of this section. (4) If the appropriate local election official to whom the ballot or voter or address information is transmitted under division (B)(3) of this section determines that the individual is eligible to vote, the individual's provisional ballot shall be counted as a vote in that election. (5)(a) At the time that an individual casts a provisional ballot, the appropriate local election official shall give the individual written information that states that any individual who casts a provisional ballot will be able to ascertain under the system established under division (B)(5)(b) of this section whether the vote was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, the reason that the vote was not counted. (b) The appropriate state or local election official shall establish a free access system, in the form of a toll-free telephone number, that any individual who casts a provisional ballot may access to discover whether the vote of that individual was counted, and, if the vote was not counted, the reason that the vote was not counted. The free access system established under this division also shall provide to an individual whose provisional ballot was not counted information explaining how that individual may contact the board of elections to register to vote or to resolve problems with the individual's voter registration. The appropriate state or local election official shall establish and maintain reasonable procedures necessary to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of personal information collected, stored, or otherwise used by the free access system established under this division. The system shall permit an individual only to gain access to information about the individual's own provisional ballot. (6) If, at the time that an individual casts a provisional ballot, the individual provides photo identification, the individual shall record the type of identification provided on the provisional ballot affirmation and, if the individual provides an Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification document, the individual also shall write the individual's driver's license or state identification card number on the provisional ballot affirmation. (7)(a) For a provisional ballot to be eligible to be counted when it is cast by an individual who does not have photo identification because the individual has a religious objection to being photographed, the individual shall complete an affidavit of religious objection under section 3505.19 of the Revised Code. The election officials shall attach the affidavit to the individual's provisional ballot envelope. If the individual does not complete the affidavit at the time of casting the provisional ballot, the individual may appear at the office of the board of elections within four days after the day of the election and complete the affidavit. (b) For a provisional ballot to be eligible to be counted when it is cast by any other individual who does not have or is unable to provide photo identification to the election officials, the individual who cast that ballot, within four days after the day of the election, shall appear at the office of the board of elections and provide photo identification. (8) For a provisional ballot cast by an individual who has been successfully challenged under section 3505.20 of the Revised Code to be eligible to be counted, the individual who cast that ballot, within four days after the day of that election, shall provide to the board of elections any identification or other documentation required to be provided by the applicable challenge questions asked of that individual under section 3505.20 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) If an individual declares that the individual is eligible to vote in a precinct other than the precinct in which the individual desires to vote, or if, upon review of the precinct voting location guide using the residential street address provided by the individual, an election official at the precinct at which the individual desires to vote determines that the individual is not eligible to vote in that precinct, the election official shall direct the individual to the precinct and polling place in which the individual appears to be eligible to vote, explain that the individual may cast a provisional ballot at the current location but the ballot or a portion of the ballot will not be counted if it is cast in the wrong precinct, and provide the telephone number of the board of elections in case the individual has additional questions. (2) If the individual refuses to travel to the correct precinct or to the office of the board of elections to cast a ballot, the individual shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot at that precinct in accordance with division (B) of this section. If the individual is in the correct polling location for the precinct in which the individual is registered and eligible to vote, the election official shall complete and sign, under penalty of election falsification, a form that includes all of the following, and attach the form to the individual's provisional ballot affirmation: (a) The name or number of the individual's correct precinct; (b) A statement that the election official instructed the individual to travel to the correct precinct to vote; (c) A statement that the election official informed the individual that casting a provisional ballot in the wrong precinct would result in all or a portion of the votes on the ballot being rejected; (d) The name or number of the precinct in which the individual is casting a provisional ballot; and (e) The name of the polling location in which the individual is casting a provisional ballot. (D) The appropriate local election official shall cause voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place on the day of each election. (E) As used in this section and sections 3505.182 and 3505.183 of the Revised Code: (1) "Precinct voting location guide" means either of the following: (a) An electronic or paper record that lists the correct precinct and polling place for either each specific residential street address in the county or the range of residential street addresses located in each neighborhood block in the county; (b) Any other method that a board of elections creates that allows a precinct election official or any elector who is at a polling place in that county to determine the correct precinct and polling place of any qualified elector who resides in the county. (2) "Voting information" means all of the following: (a) A sample version of the ballot that will be used for that election; (b) Information regarding the date of the election and the hours during which polling places will be open; (c) Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a vote and how to cast a provisional ballot; (d) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters under applicable federal and state laws; (e) General information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated; (f) General information on federal and state laws regarding prohibitions against acts of fraud and misrepresentation. (F) Nothing in this section or section 3505.183 of the Revised Code is in derogation of section 3505.24 of the Revised Code, which permits a blind, disabled, or illiterate elector to receive assistance in the marking of the elector's ballot by two precinct election officials of different political parties. A blind, disabled, or illiterate elector may receive assistance in marking that elector's provisional ballot and in completing the required affirmation in the same manner as an elector may receive assistance on the day of an election under that section. Sec. 3509.02. (A) Any qualified elector may vote by absent voter's ballots at an election. (B) Any qualified elector who is unable to appear at the office of the board of elections or, if pursuant to division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code the board has designated another location in the county at which registered electors may vote, at that other location on account of personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity, and who moves from one precinct to another within a county, changes the elector's name and moves from one precinct to another within a county, or moves from one county to another county within the state, on or prior to the day of a general, primary, or special election and has not filed a notice of change of residence or change of name voter registration update form may vote by absent voter's ballots in that election as specified in division (G) (E) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3509.03. (A) Except as otherwise provided in sections 3509.051, 3511.02, and 3511.021 of the Revised Code, any qualified elector desiring to vote absent voter's ballots at an election shall deliver a written application for those ballots, either in person or by mail, to the board of elections of the county in which the elector's voting residence is located. (B) Except as otherwise permitted under section 3511.02 of the Revised Code and under division (C) of this section, the application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall contain all of the following: (1) The elector's name; (2) The elector's signature; (3) The address at which the elector is registered to vote; (4) The elector's date of birth; (5) One of the following: (a) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number; (b) The last four digits of the elector's social security number; (c) A copy of the elector's photo identification. (6) A statement identifying the election for which absent voter's ballots are requested; (7) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is a qualified elector; (8) If the request is for primary election ballots, the elector's political party affiliation whose ballot the elector wishes to cast or an indication that the elector wishes to cast an issues-only ballot; (9) If the elector desires ballots to be mailed to the elector, the address to which those ballots shall be mailed. (C) If the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the elector may provide the elector's program participant identification number instead of the address at which the elector is registered to vote. (D) Except as otherwise provided in division (A) of section 3509.051 and in division (B) of section 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an application to receive absent voter's ballots shall be delivered to the office of the board not earlier than the first day of January of the year of the elections for which the absent voter's ballots are requested or not earlier than ninety days before the day of the election at which the ballots are to be voted, whichever is earlier, and not later than the close of business on the seventh day before the day of the election at which the ballots are to be voted. (E) Except as permitted under section 111.31 of the Revised Code, no public office, and no public official or employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall do either of the following: (1) Prepay the return postage for an application for absent voter's ballots; (2) Mail or otherwise deliver an unsolicited application for absent voter's ballots to any person. (F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(2) of this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, no person shall preprint or fill out any portion of an application for absent voter's ballots on behalf of an applicant. (2) The secretary of state or a board of elections may preprint only an applicant's name and address on an application for absent voter's ballots before mailing that application to the applicant, except that if the applicant has a confidential voter registration record, the secretary of state or a board of elections shall not preprint the applicant's address on the application. (3) A completed application for absent voter's ballots is not valid if any portion of it has been completed by any person other than the applicant in violation of division (F) of this section. Sec. 3509.04. (A) If a board of elections receives an application for absent voter's ballots that does not contain all of the required information or is not submitted on an appropriate form, the board promptly shall notify the applicant of the additional information required to be provided by the applicant to complete that application, direct the applicant to use an appropriate form, or both, as applicable. (B) Upon receipt by the board of elections of an application for absent voter's ballots that contains all of the required information and is submitted on an appropriate form, as provided by section 3509.03 and division (G) (E) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code, the board, if the board finds that the applicant is a qualified elector, shall deliver to the applicant in person or mail directly to the applicant by special delivery mail, air mail, or regular mail, postage prepaid, proper absent voter's ballots. The board shall deliver or mail with the ballots an unsealed identification envelope upon the face of which shall be printed a form substantially as follows: "Identification Envelope Statement of Voter I, ________________________(Name of voter), declare under penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. My voting residence in Ohio is ________________________________________________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) Ohio, which is in Ward _____________ Precinct ________________ in that city, village, or township. If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am providing my program participant identification number instead of my residence address: ________________________ The If this election is a primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope are primary election ballots : (check one) ___ I have cast the ballot of the _____________ Party; ___ I have cast an issues-only ballot. Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be held on the __________________________ day of ______________________, ____. My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), __________ (Year). (Voter must provide one of the following:) My Ohio driver's license or state identification card number is _______________ (Driver's license or state identification card number). The last four digits of my Social Security Number are _______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). ______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state identification card number or the last four digits of my Social Security Number, I am enclosing a copy of my photo identification in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. _________________________ (Signature of Voter) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The board shall mail with the ballots and the unsealed identification envelope an unsealed return envelope upon the face of which shall be printed the post-office address of the board. In the upper left corner on the face of the return envelope, several blank lines shall be printed upon which the voter may write the voter's name and return address. The return envelope shall be of such size that the identification envelope can be conveniently placed within it for returning the identification envelope to the board. No public office, and no public official or employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall prepay the return postage for any absent voter's ballots. Except as otherwise provided in this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election official shall not fill out any portion of an identification envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an elector's name and address on an identification envelope statement of voter before mailing absent voter's ballots to the elector, except that if the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the board of elections shall not preprint the elector's address on the identification envelope statement of voter. Sec. 3509.08. (A) Any qualified elector, who, on account of the elector's own personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity, or on account of the elector's confinement in a jail or workhouse under sentence for a misdemeanor or awaiting trial on a felony or misdemeanor, will be unable to travel from the elector's home or place of confinement to the voting booth in the elector's precinct on the day of any general, special, or primary election may make application in writing for an absent voter's ballot to the board of elections of the elector's county in the manner described in section 3509.03 of the Revised Code. The application shall state the nature of the elector's illness, physical disability, or infirmity, or the fact that the elector is confined in a jail or workhouse and the elector's resultant inability to travel to the election booth in the elector's precinct on election day. The absent voter's ballot may be mailed directly to the applicant at the applicant's voting residence or place of confinement as stated in the applicant's application, or the board may designate two board employees belonging to the two major political parties for the purpose of delivering the ballot to the disabled or confined elector and returning it to the board, unless the applicant is confined to a public or private institution within the county, in which case the board shall designate two board employees belonging to the two major political parties for the purpose of delivering the ballot to the disabled or confined elector and returning it to the board. In all other instances, the ballot shall be returned to the office of the board in the manner prescribed in section 3509.05 of the Revised Code. Any disabled or confined elector who declares to the two board employees belonging to the two major political parties that the elector is unable to mark the elector's ballot by reason of physical infirmity that is apparent to the employees to be sufficient to incapacitate the voter from marking the elector's ballot properly, may receive, upon request, the assistance of the employees in marking the elector's ballot, and they shall thereafter give no information in regard to this matter. Such assistance shall not be rendered for any other cause. When two board employees belonging to the two major political parties deliver a ballot to a disabled or confined elector, each of the employees shall be present when the ballot is delivered, when assistance is given, and when the ballot is returned to the office of the board, and shall subscribe to the declaration on the identification envelope. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of application for absent voter's ballots under this division. This chapter applies to disabled and confined absent voter's ballots except as otherwise provided in this section. (B)(1) Any qualified elector who is unable to travel to the voting booth in the elector's precinct on the day of any general, special, or primary election may apply to the board of elections of the county where the elector is a qualified elector to vote in the election by absent voter's ballot if either of the following apply: (a) The elector is confined in a hospital as a result of an accident or unforeseeable medical emergency occurring before the election; (b) The elector's minor child is confined in a hospital as a result of an accident or unforeseeable medical emergency occurring before the election. (2) The application authorized under division (B)(1) of this section shall be made in writing in the manner described in section 3509.03 of the Revised Code, except that the application shall be delivered to the office of the board not later than three p.m. on the day of the election. The application shall indicate the hospital where the applicant or the applicant's child is confined, the date of the applicant's or the applicant's child's admission to the hospital, and the offices for which the applicant is qualified to vote. The applicant may also request that a member of the applicant's family, as listed in section 3509.05 of the Revised Code, deliver the absent voter's ballot to the applicant. The board, after establishing to the board's satisfaction the validity of the circumstances claimed by the applicant, shall supply an absent voter's ballot to be delivered to the applicant. When the applicant or the applicant's child is in a hospital in the county where the applicant is a qualified elector and no request is made for a member of the family to deliver the ballot, the board shall arrange for the delivery of an absent voter's ballot to the applicant, and for its return to the office of the board, by two board employees belonging to the two major political parties according to the procedures prescribed in division (A) of this section. When the applicant or the applicant's child is in a hospital outside the county where the applicant is a qualified elector and no request is made for a member of the family to deliver the ballot, the board shall arrange for the delivery of an absent voter's ballot to the applicant by mail, and the ballot shall be returned to the office of the board in the manner prescribed in section 3509.05 of the Revised Code. (3) Any qualified elector who is eligible to vote under division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code but is unable to do so because of the circumstances described in division (B)(2) of this section may vote in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section if that qualified elector states in the application for absent voter's ballots that that qualified elector moved or had a change of name under the circumstances described in division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code and if that qualified elector complies with divisions (G)(1) (E)(1) to (4) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code. (C) Any qualified elector described in division (A) or (B)(1) of this section who needs no assistance to vote or to return absent voter's ballots to the board of elections may apply for absent voter's ballots under section 3509.03 of the Revised Code instead of applying for them under this section or may cast absent voter's ballots in person under section 3509.051 of the Revised Code. (D) Any qualified elector described in division (A) or (B)(1) of this section to whom ballots are delivered by two employees of the board of elections or who votes with the assistance of two employees of the board of elections shall be considered to have cast absent voter's ballots by mail, rather than in person, for the purpose of the laws governing voter identification. Sec. 3513.041. A write-in space shall be provided on the ballot for every office, except in an election for which the board of elections has received no valid declarations of intent to be a write-in candidate under this section. Write-in votes shall not be counted for any candidate who has not filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate pursuant to this section. A qualified person who has filed a declaration of intent may receive write-in votes at either a primary or general election. Any candidate shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate before four p.m. of the seventy-second day preceding the election at which such candidacy is to be considered. If the election is to be determined by electors of a county or a district or subdivision within the county, such declaration shall be filed with the board of elections of that county. If the election is to be determined by electors of a subdivision located in more than one county, such declaration shall be filed with the board of elections of the county in which the major portion of the population of such subdivision is located. If the election is to be determined by electors of a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state, such declaration shall be filed with the board of elections of the most populous county in such district. Any candidate for an office to be voted upon by electors throughout the entire state shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate with the secretary of state before four p.m. of the seventy-second day preceding the election at which such candidacy is to be considered. In addition, candidates for president and vice-president of the United States shall also file with the secretary of state by that seventy-second day a slate of presidential electors sufficient in number to satisfy the requirements of the United States constitution. A board of elections shall not accept for filing the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, for any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. No person shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the office of governor unless the declaration also shows the intent of another person to be a write-in candidate for the office of lieutenant governor. No person shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the office of lieutenant governor unless the declaration also shows the intent of another person to be a write-in candidate for the office of governor. No person shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor if the person has previously filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate to the office of governor or lieutenant governor at the same primary or general election. A write-in vote for the two candidates who file such a declaration shall be counted as a vote for them as joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. The secretary of state shall not accept for filing the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person for the office of governor unless the declaration also shows the intent of another person to be a write-in candidate for the office of lieutenant governor, shall not accept for filing the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person for the office of lieutenant governor unless the declaration also shows the intent of another person to be a write-in candidate for the office of governor, and shall not accept for filing the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person to the office of governor or lieutenant governor if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, for any other state office or any federal or county office. Protests against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate may be filed by any qualified elector who is eligible to vote in the election at which the candidacy is to be considered. The protest shall be in writing and shall be filed not later than four p.m. of the sixty-seventh day before the day of the election. The protest shall be filed with the board of elections with which the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate was filed. Upon the filing of the protest, the board with which it is filed shall promptly fix the time for hearing it and shall proceed in regard to the hearing in the same manner as for hearings set for protests filed under section 3513.05 of the Revised Code. At the time fixed, the board shall hear the protest and determine the validity or invalidity of the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. If the board finds that the candidate is not an elector of the state, district, county, or political subdivision in which the candidate seeks election to office; is not affiliated with the political party whose nomination or office the candidate seeks at a primary election, if applicable; or has not fully complied with the requirements of Title XXXV of the Revised Code in regard to the candidate's candidacy, the candidate's declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate shall be determined to be invalid and shall be rejected; otherwise, it shall be determined to be valid. The determination of the board is final. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. Sec. 3513.05. Each person desiring to become a candidate for a party nomination at a primary election or for election to an office or position to be voted for at a primary election, except persons desiring to become joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor and except as otherwise provided in section 3513.051 of the Revised Code, shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election, file a declaration of candidacy and petition and pay the fees required under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. The declaration of candidacy and all separate petition papers shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. When the offices are to be voted for at a primary election, persons desiring to become joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election, comply with section 3513.04 of the Revised Code. The prospective joint candidates' declaration of candidacy and all separate petition papers of candidacies shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy and petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of candidacy is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, if the declaration of candidacy is for a municipal or township office. If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy which is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, the petition, including a petition for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by at least one thousand qualified electors who are members of affiliated with the same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and the declaration of candidacy and petition shall be filed with the secretary of state; provided that the secretary of state shall not accept or file any such petition appearing on its face to contain signatures of more than three thousand electors. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, if the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors within a district, political subdivision, or portion thereof, the petition shall be signed by not less than fifty qualified electors who are members of affiliated with the same political party as the political party of which the candidate is a member. If the declaration of candidacy is for party nomination as a candidate for member of the legislative authority of a municipal corporation elected by ward, the petition shall be signed by not less than twenty-five qualified electors who are members of affiliated with the same political party of which as the candidate is a member. No such petition, except the petition for a candidacy that is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, shall be accepted for filing if it appears to contain on its face signatures of more than three times the minimum number of signatures. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures accepted exceeds three times the minimum number of signatures required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying signatures on petitions when the number of verified signatures equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy for party nomination or for election as a candidate of a minor party, the minimum number of signatures on such petition is one-half the minimum number provided in this section, except that, when the candidacy is one for election as a member of the state central committee or the county central committee of a political party, the minimum number shall be the same for a minor party as for a major party. If a declaration of candidacy is one for election as a member of the state central committee or the county central committee of a political party, the petition shall be signed by five qualified electors of the district, county, ward, township, or precinct within which electors may vote for such candidate. The electors signing such petition shall be members of affiliated with the same political party as the political party of which the candidate is a member. For purposes of signing or circulating a petition of candidacy for party nomination or election, an elector is considered to be a member of a political party if the elector voted in that party's primary election within the preceding two calendar years, or if the elector did not vote in any other party's primary election within the preceding two calendar years. If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors within a county, or within a district or subdivision or part thereof smaller than a county, the petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county. If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors of a district or subdivision or part thereof that is situated in more than one county, the petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county within which the major portion of the population thereof, as ascertained by the next preceding federal census, is located. A petition shall consist of separate petition papers, each of which shall contain signatures of electors of only one county. Petitions or separate petition papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county shall not thereby be declared invalid. In case petitions or separate petition papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county are filed, the board shall determine the county from which the majority of signatures came, and only signatures from such county shall be counted. Signatures from any other county shall be invalid. Each separate petition paper shall be circulated by one person only, who shall be the candidate or a joint candidate or a member of person who is affiliated with the same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and each separate petition paper shall be governed by the rules set forth in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each board such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with the secretary of state as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of such board. The board of the most populous county of a district shall promptly transmit to each board within such district such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of each such board. The board of a county within which the major portion of the population of a subdivision, situated in more than one county, is located, shall promptly transmit to the board of each other county within which a portion of such subdivision is located such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport to contain signatures of electors of the portion of such subdivision in the county of each such board. All petition papers so transmitted to a board and all petitions accompanying declarations of candidacy filed with a board shall, under proper regulations, be open to public inspection until four p.m. of the eightieth day before the day of the next primary election. Each board shall, not later than the seventy-eighth day before the day of that primary election, examine and determine the validity or invalidity of the signatures on the petition papers so transmitted to or filed with it and shall return to the secretary of state all petition papers transmitted to it by the secretary of state, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of signatures thereon, and shall return to each other board all petition papers transmitted to it by such board, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of the signatures thereon. All other matters affecting the validity or invalidity of such petition papers shall be determined by the secretary of state or the board with whom such petition papers were filed. For purposes of being eligible to sign or circulate a petition of candidacy for party nomination or election, an elector is considered to be affiliated with a political party if, at the time the petition is verified, the elector is affiliated with that party as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code. Protests against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy for party nomination or for election to an office or position, as provided in this section, may be filed by any qualified elector who is a member of affiliated with the same political party as the candidate and who is eligible to vote at the primary election for the candidate whose declaration of candidacy the elector objects to, or by the controlling committee of that political party. The protest shall be in writing, and shall be filed not later than four p.m. of the seventy-fourth day before the day of the primary election. The protest shall be filed with the election officials with whom the declaration of candidacy and petition was filed. Upon the filing of the protest, the election officials with whom it is filed shall promptly fix the time for hearing it, and shall forthwith mail notice of the filing of the protest and the time fixed for hearing to the person whose candidacy is so protested. They shall also forthwith mail notice of the time fixed for such hearing to the person who filed the protest. At the time fixed, such election officials shall hear the protest and determine the validity or invalidity of the declaration of candidacy and petition. If they find that such candidate is not an elector of the state, district, county, or political subdivision in which the candidate seeks a party nomination or election to an office or position, is not affiliated with the political party, or has not fully complied with this chapter, the candidate's declaration of candidacy and petition shall be determined to be invalid and shall be rejected; otherwise, it shall be determined to be valid. That determination shall be final. A protest against the candidacy of any persons filing a declaration of candidacy for joint party nomination to the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be filed, heard, and determined in the same manner as a protest against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy singly. The secretary of state shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to each board in the state the forms of the official ballots to be used at the primary election, together with the names of the candidates to be printed on the ballots whose nomination or election is to be determined by electors throughout the entire state and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. The board of the most populous county in a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county in the district the names of the candidates to be printed on the official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose nomination or election is to be determined only by electors within the district and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. The board of a county within which the major portion of the population of a subdivision smaller than the county and situated in more than one county is located shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county in which a portion of that subdivision is located the names of the candidates to be printed on the official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose nomination or election is to be determined only by electors within that subdivision and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. Sec. 3513.07. The form of declaration of candidacy and petition of a person desiring to be a candidate for a party nomination or a candidate for election to an office or position to be voted for at a primary election shall be substantially as follows: "DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY PARTY PRIMARY ELECTION I, ___________________________ (Name of Candidate), the undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election falsification that my voting residence is in _______________ precinct of the _____________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City or Village) in the county of ________________, Ohio; that my voting residence is _______________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the _____________________________ (City or Village) of _________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector in the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I am a member of affiliated with the ________ Party. I hereby declare that I desire to be ____________________ (a candidate for nomination as a candidate of the Party for election to the office of _____________) (a candidate for election to the office or position of ______________) for the ____________ in the state, district, (Full term or unexpired term ending _______________) county, city, or village of ___________________, at the primary election to be held on the _____________ day of _________, ____, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official primary election ballot of the said __________ Party as a candidate for _________ (such nomination) or (such election) as provided by law. I further declare that, if elected to said office or position, I will qualify therefor, and that I will support and abide by the principles enunciated by the ____________ Party. Dated this __________ day of _________________, _________ __________________________________ (Signature of candidate) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. PETITION OF CANDIDATE We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of Ohio, whose voting residence is in the county, city, village, ward, township, or school district, and precinct set opposite our names, and members of affiliated with the _______________________________________ Party, hereby certify that ____________________________ (Name of candidate) whose declaration of candidacy is filed herewith, is a member of affiliated with the ____________ Party, and is, in our opinion, well qualified to perform the duties of the office or position to which that candidate desires to be elected. Street City, and Village or Signature Number Township Ward Precinct County Date (Must use address on file with the board of elections) ________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ - _______________________________________ (Name of circulator of petition), declares under penalty of election falsification that the circulator of the petition is a qualified elector of the state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below the signature of that circulator; that the circulator is a member of affiliated with the ___________ Party; that the circulator is the circulator of the foregoing petition paper containing _____________ (Number) signatures; that the circulator witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. _____________________________ (Signature of circulator) ____________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) _________________________ (If petition is for a statewide candidate, the name and address of person employing to circulate petition, if any) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of declaration of candidacy and petition, and the form shall be substantially similar to the declaration of candidacy and petition set forth in this section, that will be suitable for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. The petition provided for in this section shall be circulated only by a member of an elector who is affiliated with the same political party as the candidate. Sec. 3513.18. (A) Party primaries shall be held at the same place and time, but there shall be separate pollbooks and tally sheets provided at each polling place for each party participating in the election. The pollbooks shall include each elector's political party affiliation, if any, as of the thirtieth day before the day of the primary election. Except as otherwise provided in section 3513.19 of the Revised Code, an elector may change affiliation to a different political party or, being previously unaffiliated, become affiliated with a political party by requesting and casting the ballot of that political party at a primary election. (B) If a special election on a question or issue is held on the day of a primary election, there an elector who does not wish to be affiliated with any political party may cast an issues-only ballot that contains only such questions or issues. If the elector is affiliated with a political party before casting an issues-only ballot, the elector becomes unaffiliated. There shall be provided in the pollbooks pages on which shall be recorded the names of all electors voting on said question or issue and not voting in such primary who cast an issues-only ballot. It shall not be necessary for electors desiring to vote only on the question or issue to declare their political affiliation. Sec. 3513.19. (A) It is the duty of any precinct election official, whenever any such official doubts that a person attempting to vote at a primary election is legally entitled to vote at that election, to challenge the right of that person to vote. The right of a person to vote at a primary election may be challenged upon the following grounds: (1) That the person whose right to vote is challenged is not a legally qualified elector; (2) That the person has received or has been promised some valuable reward or consideration for the person's vote; (3) That the person is not affiliated with or is not a member of the political party whose ballot the person desires to vote. Such party affiliation shall be determined by examining the elector's voting record for the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years as shown on the voter's registration card, using the standards of affiliation specified in the seventh paragraph of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code. Division (A)(3) of this section and the seventh paragraph of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code do not prohibit a person who holds an elective office for which candidates are nominated at a party primary election from doing any of the following: (a) If the person voted as a member of a different political party at any primary election within the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years, being a candidate for nomination at a party primary held during the times specified in division (C)(2) of section 3513.191 of the Revised Code provided that the person complies with the requirements of that section; (b) Circulating the person's own petition of candidacy for party nomination in the primary election as described in section 3505.20 of the Revised Code. If a majority of the precinct officials finds that, based on that section, the person is not entitled to vote at the primary election, the person shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. (B) When the right of a person to vote is challenged upon the ground set forth in division (A)(3) of this section, membership in or political affiliation with a political party shall be determined by the person's If an elector requests the ballot of a political party with which the elector is not affiliated, as indicated in the pollbook, and a precinct election official has personal knowledge that the elector does not desire to be affiliated with that party or does not support the principles of that party, the precinct election official may challenge the right of the elector to cast that party's ballot on that ground. The elector shall be permitted to cast that party's ballot if the elector signs a statement, made under penalty of election falsification, that the person elector desires to be affiliated with and supports the principles of the political party whose primary ballot the person elector desires to vote. If the elector refuses to sign such a statement, the elector shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3513.191. (A) No person shall be a candidate for nomination or election at a party primary if the person voted as a member of a different is not affiliated with that political party at any primary election within the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years, as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, either of the following persons may be candidates for nomination of any political party at a party primary: (1) A person who does not hold an elective office; (2) A person who holds an elective office other than one for which candidates are nominated at a party primary. (C)(1) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, a A person who holds an elective office for which candidates are nominated at a party primary may be a candidate at a primary election held during the times specified in division (C)(2) of this section for nomination as a candidate of a political party of which the person is prohibited from being a candidate for nomination under division (A) of this section , other than the party that most recently nominated the person as a candidate for the office the person currently holds, only if all of the following are true: (1) The person submits a voter registration update form reflecting the change of political party affiliation not later than four p.m. of the thirtieth day before a declaration of candidacy and petition is required to be filed under section 3513.05 of the Revised Code. (2) The person files a declaration of intent to seek the nomination of that the person's new party and if, by filing the declaration, the person has not violated division (C)(3) of this section. The declaration of intent shall: (a) Be filed not later than four p.m. of the thirtieth day before a declaration of candidacy and petition is required to be filed under section 3513.05 of the Revised Code; (b) Be filed with the same official with whom the person filing the declaration of intent is required to file a declaration of candidacy and petition; (c) Indicate the political party whose nomination in the primary election the person seeks; (d) Be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. (3) The person has not violated division (C) of this section. (2) (C)(1) No person filing a declaration of intent under division (C)(1) (B) of this section shall be a candidate at any primary election for nomination for an elective office for which candidates are nominated at a party primary during the calendar year in which the person files the declaration or during the next calendar year except as a candidate of the party indicated under division (C)(1)(c) (B)(2)(c) of this section. (3) (2) No person who files a declaration of intent under division (C)(1) (B)(2) of this section shall file another such declaration for a period of ten years after the declaration is filed. (4) Notwithstanding the seventh paragraph of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code, a person who complies with this section may circulate that person's own petition of candidacy for party nomination at the party primary at which the person seeks nomination under this section. Sec. 3513.257. Each person desiring who is not affiliated with a political party, as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code, and who desires to become an independent candidate for an office for which candidates may be nominated at a primary election, except persons desiring to become independent joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor and for the offices of president and vice-president of the United States, shall file no later than four p.m. of the day before the day of the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which such candidacy is to be voted for by the voters, a statement of candidacy and nominating petition as provided in section 3513.261 of the Revised Code. Persons desiring to become independent joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall file, not later than four p.m. of the day before the day of the primary election, one statement of candidacy and one nominating petition for the two of them. Persons desiring to become independent joint candidates for the offices of president and vice-president of the United States shall file, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the general election at which the president and vice-president are to be elected, one statement of candidacy and one nominating petition for the two of them. The prospective independent joint candidates' statement of candidacy shall be filed with the nominating petition as one instrument. The statement of candidacy and separate petition papers of each candidate or pair of joint candidates shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. The nominating petition shall contain signatures of qualified electors of the district, political subdivision, or portion of a political subdivision in which the candidacy is to be voted on in an amount to be determined as follows: (A) If the candidacy is to be voted on by electors throughout the entire state, the nominating petition, including the nominating petition of independent joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by no less than five thousand qualified electors, provided that no petition shall be accepted for filing if it purports to contain more than fifteen thousand signatures. (B) If the candidacy is to be voted on by electors in any district, political subdivision, or part thereof in which less than five thousand electors voted for the office of governor at the most recent election for that office, the nominating petition shall contain signatures of not less than twenty-five qualified electors of the district, political subdivision, or part thereof, or a number of qualified signatures equal to at least five per cent of that vote, if this number is less than twenty-five. (C) If the candidacy is to be voted on by electors in any district, political subdivision, or part thereof in which five thousand or more electors voted for the office of governor at the most recent election for that office, the nominating petition shall contain a number of signatures equal to at least one per cent of those electors. All nominating petitions of candidates for offices to be voted on by electors throughout the entire state shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. No nominating petition for the offices of president and vice-president of the United States shall be accepted for filing unless there is submitted to the secretary of state, at the time of filing the petition, a slate of presidential electors sufficient in number to satisfy the requirement of the United States Constitution. The secretary of state shall not accept for filing the statement of candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of governor unless it also shows the joint candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of lieutenant governor, shall not accept for filing the statement of candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of lieutenant governor unless it also shows the joint candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of governor, and shall not accept for filing the statement of candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate to the office of governor or lieutenant governor who, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a statement of candidacy, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any other state office or any federal or county office. Nominating petitions of candidates for offices to be voted on by electors within a district or political subdivision comprised of more than one county but less than all counties of the state shall be filed with the boards of elections of that county or part of a county within the district or political subdivision which had a population greater than that of any other county or part of a county within the district or political subdivision according to the last federal decennial census. Nominating petitions for offices to be voted on by electors within a county or district smaller than a county shall be filed with the board of elections for such county. No petition other than the petition of a candidate whose candidacy is to be considered by electors throughout the entire state shall be accepted for filing if it appears on its face to contain more than three times the minimum required number of signatures. A board of elections shall not accept for filing a nominating petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the nominating petition is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures accepted exceeds three times the minimum number of signatures required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying signatures when the number of verified signatures on a petition equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. Any candidate, other than a candidate for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, who files a nominating petition may request, at the time of filing, that the candidate be designated on the ballot as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate, or may request that the candidate's name be placed on the ballot without any designation. Any such candidate who fails to request a designation either as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate shall have the candidate's name placed on the ballot without any designation. The purpose of establishing a filing deadline for independent candidates prior to the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which the candidacy is to be voted on by the voters is to recognize that the state has a substantial and compelling interest in protecting its electoral process by encouraging political stability, ensuring that the winner of the election will represent a majority of the community, providing the electorate with an understandable ballot, and enhancing voter education, thus fostering informed and educated expressions of the popular will in a general election. The filing deadline for independent candidates required in this section prevents splintered parties and unrestrained factionalism, avoids political fragmentation, and maintains the integrity of the ballot. The deadline, one day prior to the primary election, is the least drastic or restrictive means of protecting these state interests. The general assembly finds that the filing deadline for independent candidates in primary elections required in this section is reasonably related to the state's purpose of ensuring fair and honest elections while leaving unimpaired the political, voting, and associational rights secured by the first and fourteenth amendments to the United States Constitution. Sec. 3517.012. (A)(1) When a party formation petition meeting the requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code declaring the intention to organize a political party is filed with the secretary of state, the new party comes into legal existence on the date of filing and is entitled to nominate candidates to appear on the ballot at the general election held in even-numbered years that occurs more than one hundred twenty-five days after the date of filing. (2)(a) Upon receiving a party formation petition filed under division (A)(1) of this section, the secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each board of elections the separate petition papers that purport to contain signatures of electors of that board's county. (b) Not later than the one hundred eighteenth day before the day of the general election, each board shall examine and determine the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition papers and shall return them to the secretary of state, together with the board's certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of the signatures on the petition. (c) Any qualified elector may file a written protest against the petition with the secretary of state not later than the one hundred fourteenth day before the day of the general election. Any such protest shall be resolved in the manner specified under section 3501.39 of the Revised Code. (d) Not later than the ninety-fifth day before the day of the general election, the secretary of state shall determine whether the party formation petition is sufficient and shall notify the committee designated in the petition of that determination. (B)(1) Not later than one hundred ten days before the day of that general election and not earlier than the day the applicable party formation petition is filed, each candidate or pair of joint candidates wishing to appear on the ballot at the general election as the nominee or nominees of the party that filed the party formation petition shall file a nominating petition, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, that includes the name of the political party that submitted the party formation petition. Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 3505.03, 3505.08, 3506.11, 3513.31, 3513.311, and 3513.312 of the Revised Code, the provisions of the Revised Code concerning independent candidates who file nominating petitions apply to candidates who file nominating petitions under this section. (2)(a) If the candidacy is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, the nominating petition, including a petition for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by at least fifty qualified electors who have not voted as a member of are not affiliated with a different political party at any primary election within the current year or the immediately preceding two calendar years, as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if If the candidacy is to be submitted only to electors within a district, political subdivision, or portion thereof, the nominating petition shall be signed by not less than five qualified electors who have not voted as a member of are not affiliated with a different political party at any primary election within the current year or the immediately preceding two calendar years, as determined under section 3503.071 of the Revised Code. (3)(a) Each board of elections that is responsible to verify signatures on the nominating petition shall examine and determine the sufficiency of those signatures not later than the one hundred fifth day before the day of the general election and shall be resolved as specified in that section. (b) Written protests against the petition may be filed in the manner specified under section 3513.263 of the Revised Code not later than the one hundredth day before the general election and shall be resolved as specified in that section. (c) Not later than the ninety-fifth day before the day of the general election, the secretary of state or the board of elections, as applicable, shall determine whether the nominating petition is sufficient and shall notify the candidate and the committee designated in the party formation petition of that determination. (C)(1) After being notified that the political party has submitted a sufficient party formation petition under division (A) of this section, the committee designated in a party formation petition shall, not later than the seventy-fifth day before the day of the general election, certify to the secretary of state a slate of candidates consisting of candidates or joint candidates who submitted sufficient nominating petitions under division (B) of this section. The slate certifying the candidates shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by all of the individuals of the committee designated in the party formation petition. In no event shall the slate of candidates include more than one candidate for any public office or more than one set of joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. The names of the candidates or joint candidates so certified shall appear on the ballot at the general election as that party's nominees for those offices. For purposes of this division, "joint candidates" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. (2) If a candidate's nominating petition is insufficient or if the committee does not certify the candidate's name under division (C)(1) of this section, the candidate shall not appear on the ballot in the general election. (3) If a party formation petition is insufficient, no candidate shall appear on the ballot in the general election as that political party's nominee, regardless of whether any candidate's nominating petition is sufficient. Sec. 3517.013. Section Division (B) of section 3513.191 of the Revised Code does not apply to persons desiring to become candidates for party nomination of a newly formed political party meeting the requirements of sections 3517.011 and 3517.012 of the Revised Code for a period of four calendar years from the date of the party formation. Sec. 3599.12. (A) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Vote or attempt to vote in any primary, special, or general election in a precinct in which that person is not a legally qualified elector; (2) Vote or attempt to vote more than once at the same election by any means, including voting or attempting to vote both by absent voter's ballots under division (G) (E) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code and by regular ballot at the polls at the same election, or voting or attempting to vote both by absent voter's ballots under division (G) (E) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code and by absent voter's ballots under Chapter 3509. or armed service absent voter's ballots under Chapter 3511. of the Revised Code at the same election; (3) Impersonate or sign the name of another person, real or fictitious, living or dead, and vote or attempt to vote as that other person in any such election; (4) Cast a ballot at any such election after objection has been made and sustained to that person's vote; (5) Knowingly vote or attempt to vote a ballot other than the official ballot. (B) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. Section 2. That existing sections 3501.01, 3503.09, 3503.10, 3503.11, 3503.14, 3503.15, 3503.153, 3503.16, 3503.19, 3503.20, 3503.23, 3503.28, 3505.181, 3509.02, 3509.03, 3509.04, 3509.08, 3513.041, 3513.05, 3513.07, 3513.18, 3513.19, 3513.191, 3513.257, 3517.012, 3517.013, and 3599.12 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That section 3513.20 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 4. This act shall be known as the Voter Registration Modernization Act.